Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB885.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 317A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A licensee shall not perform any of the following unless practicing under the
immediate supervision of a licensed physician:
(a) Botox or collagen injections;
(b) Laser treatments; or
(c) Any service that goes beyond the stratum germinativum layer, also known
as the basal layer of the epidermis.
(2) A licensee shall not perform any service regulated by another state board or
agency without the appropriate licensing for that service, including but not
limited to:
(a) Permanent makeup;
(b) Microblading; or
(c) Piercing.
Section 2. KRS 317A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) "Beauty salon" means any establishment, fixed or mobile, in which the practice of
cosmetology is conducted for the general public or for consideration;
(2) "Board" means the Kentucky Board of Cosmetology;
(3) "Cosmetologist" means a person who engages in the practice of cosmetology for the
public generally or for consideration, regardless of the name under which the
practice is conducted;
(4) "Cosmetology" means the practice of:
(a) Hair styling;
(b) Esthetics; and
Page 1 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(c) Nail technology.
The practice of cosmetology does not include acts performed incident to treatment
of an illness or a disease;
(5) "Cosmetology school" or "school of cosmetology" means any operation, place, or
establishment in or through which persons are trained or taught the practice of
cosmetology, esthetic practices, and nail technology;
(6) "Esthetician" means a person who is licensed by the board to engage in esthetic
practices in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(7) "Esthetic practices" means one (1) or more of the following acts:
(a) Beautifying, cleansing, cosmetic preparations, exfoliating, facials, makeup,
removal of superfluous hair, stimulation, tinting, tweezing, or waxing;
(b) Eyelash tinting, artificial eyelashes, or eyelash extensions;
(c) Use of lotions, creams, oils, antiseptics, or depilatories;
(d) Massaging the skin; and
(e) Providing preoperative and postoperative esthetic skin care, either referred by
or supervised by a medical professional, unless these acts are performed
incident to:
1. Treatment of an illness or a disease;
2. Work as a student in a board-approved school; or
3. Work performed by a licensed massage therapist;
(8) "Esthetic practices school" or "school of esthetic practices" means any operation,
place, or establishment in or through which persons are trained in esthetic practices;
(9) "Esthetic salon" means any establishment, fixed or mobile[a place] where an
esthetician performs esthetic practices;
(10) "Eyelash artistry" means the process of attaching semipermanent lashes or eyelash
extensions to natural eyelashes;
(11) "Fixed salon" means a licensed, stationary, physical establishment where a
Page 2 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
person licensed under this chapter practices cosmetology or any other service
licensed or permitted under this chapter;
(12) "Hair styling" means the practice of:
(a) Arranging, beautifying, bleaching, cleansing, coloring, curling, cutting,
dressing, manipulating, permanent waving, singeing, tinting, or trimming of
natural or artificial hair;
(b) Use of lotions, creams, and antiseptics; and
(c) Massaging and stimulation of the scalp;
(13)[(12)] "Instructor" means any individual licensed to teach cosmetology, esthetics, or
nail technology who holds a corresponding license in cosmetology, esthetics
practice, or nail technology;
(14)[(13)] "Limited facility[beauty salon]" means any establishment in which the
practice of shampoo and style services, makeup artistry, eyelash artistry,[ or]
threading, or any other service licensed or permitted under this chapter is[ are]
conducted for the general public or for consideration;
(15)[(14)] "Limited stylist" means an individual licensed to perform shampoo and style
services;
(16)[(15)] (a) "Makeup artistry" means applying cosmetic products to the face and
body.
(b) "Makeup artistry" includes:
1. Corrective and camouflage techniques; and
2. Airbrushing.
(c) "Makeup artistry" does not include:
1. Face painting at carnivals or fairs; or
2. Application of cosmetics when not done for consideration;
(17) "Mobile salon":
(a) Means a licensed structure that moves on wheels where a person licensed
Page 3 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
under this chapter practices cosmetology or any other service licensed or
permitted under this chapter; and
(b) Does not mean a licensed individual performing services at different
locations that are not licensed by this chapter;
(18)[(16)] "Nail salon" means any establishment, fixed or mobile, in which the practice
of nail technology only is conducted for the general public or for consideration;
(19)[(17)] "Nail technician" means a person who practices nail technology, including
manicuring and pedicuring real and artificial nails for the purpose of beautifying,
for the general public or for consideration. Manicuring and pedicuring real and
artificial nails for the purpose of beautifying includes:
(a) Cleaning;
(b) Trimming;
(c) Cutting;
(d) Shaping;
(e) Sculpting;
(f) Polishing; and
(g) Massaging the hands and feet of any human, for which a license is required by
this chapter;
(20)[(18)] "Nail technology school" or "school of nail technology" means any operation,
place, or establishment in or through which persons are trained in nail technology;
(21)[(19)] (a) "Natural hair braiding" means a service of twisting, wrapping, weaving,
extending, locking, or braiding hair by hand or with mechanical devices.
Natural hair braiding is commonly known as "African-style hair braiding" but
is not limited to any particular cultural, ethnic, racial, or religious forms of
hair styles.
(b) "Natural hair braiding" includes:
1. The use of natural or synthetic hair extensions, natural or synthetic hair
Page 4 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
and fibers, decorative beads, and other hair accessories;
2. Minor trimming of natural hair or hair extensions incidental to twisting,
wrapping, weaving, extending, locking, or braiding hair;
3. The use of topical agents such as conditioners, gels, moisturizers, oils,
pomades, and shampoos; and
4. The making of wigs from natural hair, natural fibers, synthetic fibers,
and hair extensions.
(c) "Natural hair braiding" does not include:
1. The application of dyes, reactive chemicals, or other preparation to alter
the color of the hair or to straighten, curl, or alter the structure of the
hair; or
2. The use of chemical hair joining agents such as synthetic tape, keratin
bonds, or fusion bonds.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, "mechanical devices" means clips, combs,
curlers, curling irons, hairpins, rollers, scissors, needles, thread, and hair
binders;
(22)[(20)] (a) "Shampoo and style services" means beautifying, cleaning, or arranging
the hair of an individual for consideration[ only at a limited beauty salon].
(b) "Shampoo and style services" includes any of the following services
performed on an individual's hair:
1. Arranging;
2. Cleaning;
3. Curling;
4. Dressing;
5. Blow drying; or
6. Performing any other similar procedure.
(c) "Shampoo and style services" does not include any service that:
Page 5 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
1. Is popularly known as a Brazilian blowout;
2. Includes color services, cutting, lightening, or chemically treating hair;
or
3. Otherwise falls under the practice of cosmetology, except as authorized
in paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(23)[(21)] "Threading" means the process of removing hair from below the eyebrow by
use of a thread woven through the hair to be removed.
Section 3. KRS 317A.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not engage in the practice of cosmetology, esthetic practices, or
nail technology for other than cosmetic purposes nor shall any person engage in the
practice of cosmetology, esthetic practices, or nail technology for the treatment of
physical or mental ailments. This chapter does not apply to:
(a) Persons authorized by the law of this state to practice medicine, podiatry,
optometry, dentistry, chiropractic, nursing, or embalming who perform
incidental practices of cosmetology, esthetic practices, and nail technology in
the normal course of the practice of their profession;
(b) Commissioned medical or surgical personnel of the United States Armed
Forces who perform incidental practices of cosmetology, esthetic practices, or
nail technology in the course of their duties; and
(c) Cosmetology, esthetic practices, or nail technology services performed at an
institution operated or under contract to the Department of Corrections or the
Department of Juvenile Justice[; and
(d) Persons engaged in natural hair braiding].
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, a[no] person shall not engage
in the practice of cosmetology, esthetic practices, or nail technology for the public,
generally, or for consideration without the appropriate license required by this
chapter.
Page 6 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(3) (a) A[No] person, unless duly and properly licensed or permitted pursuant to this
chapter, shall not:
1.[(a)] Act as a cosmetologist[Teach cosmetology, esthetic practices, or
nail technology];
2.[(b)] Operate a beauty salon;
3.[(c)] Operate an esthetic salon;
4.[(d)] Act as an esthetician;
5.[(e)] Operate a nail salon;
6.[(f)] Act as a nail technician;[ or]
7.[(g)] Conduct or operate a school for cosmetologists, estheticians, or
nail technicians; or
8. Perform any other service regulated by this chapter.
(b) 1. Any person who practices, offers or attempts to practice, or holds
oneself out to practice cosmetology, esthetics, nail technology,
shampoo styling, or any other practice regulated by this chapter
without being licensed or permitted by this chapter shall, in addition to
any other penalty provided by law, pay an administrative penalty to the
board in an amount not to exceed one thousand five hundred dollars
($1,500) for each offense as determined by the board.
2. The administrative penalty shall be assessed by the board in a ruling
after an administrative hearing is held in accordance with Section 7 of
this Act and KRS Chapter 13B.
(c) The board has the authority and power to investigate any and all unlicensed
activity involving services licensed under this chapter.
(d) The administrative penalty shall be paid within sixty (60) days after the
effective date of the order imposing the administrative penalty. The order
shall constitute a judgment and may be filed and executed in the same
Page 7 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
manner as any judgment from any court of record.
(4) A[No] person shall not aid or abet any person in violating this section, nor shall any
person engage or employ for consideration any person to perform any practice
licensed or permitted by this chapter unless the person to perform the practice holds
and displays the appropriate license or permit.
(5) A licensed cosmetology, esthetic, or nail technology practice instructor, licensed
cosmetologist, licensed esthetician, licensed nail technician, licensed shampoo
stylist, or permit holder[No licensed cosmetology or esthetic practices instructors,
licensed cosmetologists, licensed estheticians, or licensed nail technicians] shall not
hold clinics for teaching or demonstrating for personal profit, either monetary or
otherwise, if the clinics are not sponsored by a recognized professional
cosmetologist's, esthetician's, or nail technician's group, or other beauty specialty
group for a service that requires a license or permit under this chapter.
(6) Whenever a person engages in different practices separately licensed, certified, or
permitted by this chapter, that person shall procure a separate license, certificate, or
permit for each of the practices in which the person engages.
(7) The board shall:
(a) Govern all issues related to this chapter;
(b) Investigate alleged violations brought to its attention, conduct investigations,
and schedule and conduct administrative hearings in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13B to enforce the provisions of this chapter and administrative
regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter;
(c) Administer oaths, receive evidence, interview persons, and require the
production of books, papers, documents, or other evidence; and
(d) Have the authority to take emergency action affecting the legal rights, duties,
privileges, or immunities of named persons without a hearing to stop, prevent,
or avoid an immediate danger to the public health, safety, or welfare, in
Page 8 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
accordance with KRS 13B.125(1), subject to the following:
1. An emergency order shall be based upon verified probable cause or
substantial evidence, documented by the board, that the emergency
order is in the interest of public health, welfare, and safety of any
customer, patient, or the general public; and
2. Upon the issuance of an emergency order, the board shall comply with
the administrative hearing procedures in KRS 13B.125(3) to determine
the reinstatement of operations of the licensed facility.
(8) (a) Unless a documented and verified violation creates an immediate and present
danger to the health and safety of the public, a warning notice shall be first
issued prior to imposing incremental punitive action against an otherwise
lawful salon. The warning notice shall include a specific and detailed
description of the violation and the specific remediation required to bring the
salon into compliance.
(b) It shall be deemed an immediate and present danger to the health and safety of
the public if it is documented and verified that a licensee knowingly employs
or utilizes the services of an unlicensed individual.
(9) The board may:
(a) Bring and maintain actions in its own name to enjoin any person in violation
of any provision of this chapter. These actions shall be brought in the Circuit
Court of the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred; and
(b) Refer violations of this chapter and any potential violations of other chapters
relating to the practice of cosmetology or any other practice regulated by
this chapter to county attorneys, Commonwealth's attorneys, and to the
Attorney General, or any other applicable enforcement arm[.
(10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an instructor, student,
cosmetologist, or nail technician from using callus graters for callus removal, and
Page 9 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
the board shall not promulgate any administrative regulation prohibiting the use of
callus graters for callus removal].
Section 4. KRS 317A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) There is created an independent agency of the state government to be known as the
Kentucky Board of Cosmetology, which shall have complete supervision over the
administration of the provisions of this chapter relating to the:
(a) Practice of cosmetology, esthetics, and nail technology;
(b) Instruction of cosmetology, esthetics, and nail technology;
(c) Salons where cosmetology, esthetics, and nail technology are practiced;
(d) Schools where cosmetology, esthetics, and nail technology are taught; and
(e) Practice, instruction, limited facility, or specialized course for any subset
skill of cosmetology, esthetics, or nail technology[cosmetology,
cosmetologists, schools of cosmetology, or esthetic practices or nail
technology, students, estheticians, nail technicians, instructors of
cosmetology, instructors of esthetic practices, or instructors of nail
technology, cosmetology salons, esthetic salons, and nail salons].
(2) The board shall be composed of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor as
follows:
(a) Four (4) of the members shall have been cosmetologists five (5) years prior to
their appointment and shall reside in Kentucky:
1. Two (2) of whom shall be cosmetology salon owners;
2. One (1) of whom shall be a cosmetology teacher in public education and
shall not own any interest in a cosmetology salon; and
3. One (1) of whom shall be an owner of or one who shall have a financial
interest in a licensed cosmetology school and shall be a member of a
nationally recognized association of cosmetologists;
(b) One (1) member shall be a licensed nail technician;
Page 10 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(c) One (1) member shall be a licensed esthetician;
(d) One (1) member shall be a citizen at large who is not associated with or
financially interested in the practices or businesses regulated; and
(e) None of whom nor the executive director shall be financially interested in, or
have any financial connection with, wholesale cosmetic supply or equipment
businesses.
At all times in the filling of vacancies of membership on the board, this balance of
representation shall be maintained.
(3) Appointments shall be for a term of two (2) years, ending on February 1.
(4) The Governor shall not remove any member of the board except for cause.
(5) The board shall elect from its members a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary.
(6) Four (4) members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any board
business.
(7) Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each
day of attendance at board meetings, and shall be reimbursed for necessary
traveling expenses and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of duties
pertaining to official business of the board.
(8) The board shall hold meetings at the place in the state and at the times deemed
necessary by the board to discharge its duties.
Section 5. KRS 317A.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All applicants for licensure under this chapter shall meet the following minimum
requirements:
(a) [Be of good moral character and temperate habit;
(b) ]Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) Have a diploma, transcript, or examination that reflects completion of
secondary education approximate to the twelfth grade in public schools in
the United States[(c) Have a high school diploma, a High School
Page 11 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
Equivalency Diploma, or results from the Test for Adult Basic Education
indicating a score equivalent to the twelfth grade of high school]; and
(c)[(d)] Have submitted the completed application along with the required
license fee as set forth in administrative regulation.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the board may refuse to grant a
license or permit to any applicant who fails to comply with the provisions of this
chapter or any administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(3) The board shall issue a cosmetologist license to any person who:
(a) Has official certification from the state board or agency that certifies
cosmetology schools that the applicant has satisfactorily completed[graduated
from a licensed school of cosmetology requiring] one thousand five hundred
(1,500) hours within five (5) years of enrolling within the school; and
(b) Has satisfactorily passed an examination prescribed by the board to determine
fitness to practice cosmetology.
(4) The board shall issue an esthetician license to any person who:
(a) Has official certification from the state board or agency that certifies
cosmetology schools that the applicant has satisfactorily completed seven
hundred fifty (750) hours of instruction in a licensed school within five (5)
years of enrolling within the school[approved by the board]; and
(b) Has satisfactorily passed[received a satisfactory grade on] an examination
prescribed by the board to determine fitness to practice as an esthetician.
(5) The board shall issue a license to act as a nail technician to any person who:
(a) Has official certification from the state board or agency that certifies
cosmetology schools that the applicant has completed satisfactorily a nail
technician course of study of four hundred fifty (450) hours in a licensed
school of cosmetology within five (5) years of enrolling within the
school[submitting an application for licensure]; and
Page 12 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(b) Has satisfactorily passed an examination prescribed by the board to determine
fitness to practice as a nail technician.
(6) The board shall issue a license to operate a fixed or mobile salon as follows:
(a) The board shall issue a license to operate a beauty salon to any licensed
cosmetologist. An owner who is not a licensed cosmetologist shall have a
licensed cosmetologist as manager of the beauty salon at all times. If the
owner, manager, or location of a beauty salon changes, the required form and
fee shall be submitted to the board;[.]
(b) The board shall issue a license to operate an esthetic salon to any licensed
esthetician. An owner who is not a licensed esthetician shall have a licensed
esthetician or cosmetologist as manager of the esthetic salon at all times. If the
owner, manager, or location of an esthetic salon changes, the required form
and fee shall be submitted to the board;[.]
(c) The board shall issue a license to operate a nail salon to any licensed nail
technician. An owner who is not a licensed nail technician shall have a
licensed nail technician or cosmetologist as manager of the nail salon at all
times. If the owner, manager, or location of a nail salon changes, the required
form and fee shall be submitted to the board; and
(d) The board shall issue a license to operate a limited facility to anyone with
an applicable license or permit prescribed by administrative regulation. An
owner who is not licensed or permitted shall have someone with an
applicable license or permit as manager of the limited facility at all times. If
the owner, manager, or location changes, the required form and fee shall be
submitted to the board.
(7) The board shall issue an instructor training certificate to train to be an instructor in
cosmetology, esthetic practices, or nail technology to any person who:
(a) Has held a current cosmetologist, esthetician, or nail technician license for at
Page 13 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
least one (1) year; and
(b) Has submitted an application that has been signed by the owners of the school
in which the applicant will study. The course of instruction shall be for a
period of seven hundred fifty (750) hours and not less than four and one-half
(4.5) months at one (1) school providing this instruction. The school owner
shall verify to the board the completion of seven hundred fifty (750) hours.
For out-of-state verification, an applicant shall provide official certification
from the board or agency that certifies schools in that other state of licensure
verifying the applicant has completed a course of instruction consisting of at
least seven hundred fifty (750) hours and not less than four and one-half (4.5)
months at one (1) school providing the instruction.
(8) The board shall issue a license to teach cosmetology to any person who:
(a) Has held a current cosmetologist license and an instructor training certificate
for at least seven hundred fifty (750) hours[four and one-half (4.5) months];
and
(b) Has satisfactorily passed the examination for the teaching of cosmetology as
prescribed by the board.
(9) The board shall issue a license to teach esthetic practices to any person who:
(a) Has held a current esthetician license and an instructor training certificate for
seven hundred fifty (750) hours[at least four and one-half (4.5) months];[
(b) Has completed fifty (50) hours in esthetics training within the last two (2)
years;] and
(b)[(c)] Has satisfactorily passed the examination for the teaching of esthetic
practices as prescribed by the board.
(10) The board shall issue a license to teach nail technology to any person who:
(a) Has held a current nail technician license and an instructor training certificate
for at least seven hundred fifty (750) hours[four and one-half (4.5) months];[
Page 14 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(b) Has completed fifty (50) hours in nail technology training within the last two
(2) years;] and
(b)[(c)] Has satisfactorily passed the examination for the teaching of nail
technology as prescribed by the board.
(11) (a) If the requirements of KRS 317A.090 have been satisfied, the board shall
issue a license to operate a school of cosmetology or a school of esthetic
practices or a school of nail technology to any person who has as manager at
all times a person who is:
1. Licensed as an instructor;
2. Charged with the responsibility of ensuring that all applicable statutes
and administrative regulations are complied with; and
3. Responsible for having a sufficient number of licensed instructors of
cosmetology or esthetic practices or nail technology to conduct the
school.
(b) Any student enrolling in the school shall pay the fee set forth in administrative
regulation to the board before enrollment in the school shall be allowed.
(c) The transfer of any license to operate a school of cosmetology or esthetic
practices or nail technology shall require the board's approval and shall
become effective upon submitting the required form and fee to the board.
(12) (a) The board shall issue a license to provide shampoo and style services to any
person who:
1. Has passed an examination prescribed by the board to determine fitness
to perform shampoo and style services;
2. Has completed at least three hundred (300) hours of instruction from a
licensed school of cosmetology; and
3. Has met any other reasonable criteria established in administrative
regulations promulgated by the board.
Page 15 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(b) The board shall issue a license to operate a limited facility[beauty salon] to
any person:
1. Who is licensed to provide shampoo and style services or who employs
at least one (1) person licensed to provide shampoo and style services at
the limited facility[beauty salon]; and
2. Whose limited[ beauty salon] facility complies with standards
established in administrative regulations promulgated by the board.
(13) Licenses established under this chapter shall be valid for a period of time to be
established by the board through the promulgation of administrative regulations.
(14) Licenses and permits issued by the board may be renewed beginning July 1 through
July 31 of each license period prescribed by administrative regulation
promulgated by the board[year].
(a) Any license shall automatically be renewed by the board:
1. Upon submission and receipt of the application for renewal and the
required annual license fee; and
2. If the application for renewal is otherwise in compliance with the
provisions of this chapter and the administrative regulations of the
board.
(b) Any license application electronically submitted or postmarked after July 31
shall be considered expired, and the appropriate restoration fee as required by
administrative regulation of the board shall apply.
(15) The requirements for a new license for any person whose license has expired for a
period exceeding five (5) years shall be as follows:
(a) Cosmetologists shall retake and pass both the practical and theory
examination;
(b) Estheticians shall retake and pass both the practical and theory examination;
(c) Instructors of cosmetology or esthetic practices shall retake and pass both the
Page 16 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
practical and theory examination;
(d) Nail technicians shall retake and pass the practical and theory examination;
(e) Providers of shampoo and style services shall retake and pass both the
practical and theory examination; and
(f) The appropriate restoration fee as set forth in administrative regulation of the
board shall be required.
(16) Guest artists or demonstrators appearing and demonstrating before persons other
than licensed cosmetologists, estheticians, nail technicians, and providers of
shampoo and style services shall apply for a permit that shall be in effect for ten
(10) days. Guest artists performing before a nonprofit, recognized professional
cosmetologists', estheticians', or cosmetology school or shampoo and style services'
or nail technicians' group shall apply for a permit, but shall not be required to pay
the fee.
(17) The board shall issue a permit for threading and may promulgate administrative
regulations that set out requirements for the practice of threading. Threading shall
be conducted in a licensed beauty salon or a facility with a permit to engage in
threading, and the board may promulgate administrative regulations for facilities
and the required sanitation standards. The permit shall be valid for the renewal
period prescribed by administrative regulation promulgated by the board[a period
of one (1) year].
(18) The board shall issue a permit for eyelash artistry and may promulgate
administrative regulations that set out the requirements for the practice of eyelash
artistry. Eyelash artistry shall be conducted in a licensed beauty salon or a facility
with a permit to engage in eyelash artistry, and the board may promulgate
administrative regulations for facilities, education, and the required sanitation
standards. The permit shall be valid for the renewal period prescribed by
administrative regulation promulgated by the board[a period of one (1) year].
Page 17 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(19) The board shall issue a permit for makeup artistry and may promulgate
administrative regulations that set out requirements for the practice of makeup
artistry and required sanitation standards. The permit shall be valid for the renewal
period to be prescribed by administrative regulation promulgated by the board[a
period of one (1) year].
(20) (a) The board shall issue a permit for natural hair braiding and may
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A to set out sanitation standards for the practice of natural hair braiding
in licensed, non-residential facilities with other professionals licensed under
this chapter. The permit shall be valid for the renewal period prescribed by
administrative regulation promulgated by the board.
(b) For a person practicing natural hair braiding, this chapter shall not be
construed to require:
1. A salon or other facility license, if working out of their home;
2. A limited facility license, if only working with other natural hair
braiders; or
3. Cosmetology instruction hours beyond a sanitation course.
(21) (a) The board may issue a permit for temporary event services to a Kentucky-
licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, limited stylist, or nail technician and shall
promulgate administrative regulations that set out requirements for issuance
of a temporary event services permit including:
1. Sanitation standards;
2. Criteria for events that qualify;
3. Application requirements and fees; and
4. Any other requirements necessary to protect the public health and
safety.
(b) The temporary event services permit shall be valid only for the specific dates
Page 18 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
and locations requested.
(c) A[No] person other than a Kentucky-licensed cosmetologist, esthetician,
limited stylist, or nail technician shall not perform services at a temporary
event services location, and a[no] licensee shall not perform services other
than those authorized by his or her respective license pursuant to KRS
317A.020.
(d) The Kentucky-licensed cosmetologist, esthetician, limited stylist, or nail
technician holding a temporary event services permit shall be liable for any
violation of KRS Chapter 317A or administrative regulations promulgated
under KRS Chapter 317A that occurs at the temporary event services location.
Section 6. KRS 317A.060 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations including but not limited to
administrative regulations that:
(a) Protect the health and safety of the public;
(b) Protect the public against incompetent or unethical practice,
misrepresentation, deceit, or fraud in the practice or teaching of beauty
culture;
(c) Set standards for the operation of the schools and all salons;
(d) Protect the students under this chapter;
(e) Set standards for mobile salons and for the location and housing of
fixed[beauty] salons or cosmetology schools in the state. This subsection does
not apply to the instructional programs in cosmetology in the state area
vocational and technical schools;
(f) Set standards for the quantity and quality of equipment, supplies, materials,
records, and furnishings required in beauty salons, esthetic salons, nail salons,
and cosmetology, esthetic practices,[ and] nail technology schools, and
limited facilities;
Page 19 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(g) Establish the qualifications of instructors of cosmetology, instructors of
esthetic practices, instructors of nail technology, and apprentice teachers;
(h) Establish requirements for the hours and courses of instruction at cosmetology
schools and esthetic practices schools and nail technology schools;
(i) Establish requirements for the examinations of applicants for licenses;
(j) Establish the requirements for the proper education and training of students;
(k) Address the course and conduct of license and permit holders under this
chapter[school owners, instructors, instructor training certificate holders,
licensed cosmetologists, estheticians, nail technicians, beauty salons, esthetic
salons, nail salons, cosmetology schools, schools of esthetic practices, and
schools of nail technology];[ and]
(l) Establish a code of professional conduct[ethics] for persons licensed and
permitted by the board; and
(m) Establish the inspection criteria and inspections for fixed and mobile
salons.
(2) Administrative regulations pertaining to health and sanitation shall be approved by
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services before becoming effective.
(3) Administrative regulations promulgated under this section shall not be unduly
burdensome and shall balance the needs of protecting the public against the
feasibility of the requirements imposed.
Section 7. KRS 317A.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall hold hearings upon the request of any licensee or applicant directly
affected by the board's decision to refuse to issue or renew a license or permit, or to
deny, suspend, probate, fine, or revoke a license or permit. A licensee or applicant
shall request a hearing within thirty (30) days of the board's notice that it seeks to
refuse to issue or renew a license or permit, or to deny, suspend, probate, fine, or
revoke a license or permit. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS
Page 20 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
Chapter 13B.
(2) The board shall hold hearings upon the request of an unlicensed party facing
penalties under this chapter. The unlicensed party shall request a hearing within
thirty (30) days of the board's notice that a penalty may be issued. The hearing
shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
(3) Rulings of the board as a result of any hearing may be appealed to the Franklin
Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.
Section 8. KRS 317A.090 is amended to read as follows:
A[No] license shall not be issued or renewed by the board to any cosmetology school or
school of esthetic practices or school of nail technology unless such school provides:
(1) The name of the proposed school;
(2) The ability to effectively and independently administer the school, reflecting
knowledge of the law in this chapter and administrative regulations prescribed by
the board[A statement that the proposed school is authorized to operate educational
programs beyond secondary education];
(3) As a prerequisite of graduation, a prescribed course of instruction of not less than
one thousand five hundred (1,500) hours for a cosmetology school or seven
hundred fifty (750) hours for a school of esthetic practices, or four hundred fifty
(450) hours for a school of nail technology;
(4) Courses of instruction in histology of the hair, skin, nails, muscles, and nerves of
the face and neck; elementary chemistry with emphasis on sterilization, diseases of
the skin, hair, and glands, and massaging and manipulating of the muscles of the
upper body; cutting, shaving, arranging, dressing, chemical treatment of the hair
and such other courses as may be prescribed by administrative regulation of the
board;
(5) Facilities, equipment, materials, and qualified instructors and instructor training as
may be required by administrative regulations of the board adopted pursuant to this
Page 21 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
chapter.[, but no] Cosmetology schools[school] or schools[school] of esthetic
practices or schools[school] of nail technology shall follow the student-teacher
ratio listed in administrative regulations promulgated by the board[have fewer
than one (1) licensed instructor per twenty (20) students present for instruction];
(6) A[No] cosmetology school or school of esthetic practices or school of nail
technology, after being licensed for the first time, shall not serve the public until
one hundred fifty (150) hours of instruction has been taught;[ and]
(7) If a complaint or concern has been validated through an inspection,
investigation, or audit, the board may take immediate remedial measures to help
the school operate according to the requirements and standards prescribed by this
chapter or in the administrative regulations prescribed by the board in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.
(8) In compliance with KRS 317A.070, the board may revoke or suspend any license
issued by it if, in the judgment of the board, the school is not following the
requirements as set out in this chapter or the school does not comply with the
administrative regulations promulgated by the board in order to regulate the
conduct of the school and in order to supervise the proper education of the students.
Section 9. KRS 317A.130 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] licensee shall not:
(a) Fail to follow sanitation standards prescribed by administrative regulations
promulgated by this agency or other agencies in accordance with the
Kentucky Revised Statutes[provide the head rest of each chair with a
relaundered towel or a sheet of clean paper for each person]; or
(b) [Fail to place around the patron's neck a strip of cotton, towel, or neck strip so
that the haircloth does not come in contact with the patron's skin;
(c) Use on one (1) patron a towel that has been used upon another patron, unless
the towel has been relaundered;
Page 22 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(d) Use on any patron any razor, scissors, tweezers, comb, bowl, recirculating
pipes, rubber disc, or part of a vibrator or other similar equipment or
appliance that comes into contact with the head, face, hands, feet, or neck of a
patron, until the equipment or appliance has been sterilized in accordance with
methods of sterilization that are bacteriologically effective and approved by
the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; or
(e) ]Use on any patron a liquid nail enhancement product containing monomeric
methyl methacrylate, also known as dental acrylic monomer, for the purpose
of creating artificial nail enhancements in the practice of cosmetology and nail
technology.
(2) This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit an instructor, student,
cosmetologist, or nail technician from using callus graters for callus removal,
and the board shall not promulgate any administrative regulation prohibiting the
use of callus graters for callus removal[No esthetician practicing under this
chapter shall perform any of the following unless practicing under the immediate
supervision of a licensed physician:
(a) Botox or collagen injections;
(b) Laser treatments;
(c) Electrolysis;
(d) Tattoo;
(e) Permanent makeup;
(f) Microblading; or
(g) Piercing].
Section 10. KRS 317A.140 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board may refuse to issue or renew a license or permit, or may suspend or
revoke a license or permit, impose probationary conditions upon, impose an
administrative fine, issue a written reprimand or admonishment, or take any
Page 23 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
combination of these actions regarding proof of any applicant's, permitee's, or
licensee's:
(a) Conviction of a felony, if in accordance with KRS Chapter 335B;
(b) Gross malpractice or incompetence;
(c) Mental or physical health that would endanger public health or safety;
(d) False or deceptive practice or misrepresentation including advertising;
(e) Practicing in an unlicensed salon or in a salon knowing that the salon is not in
compliance with this chapter or the administrative regulations of the board
promulgated pursuant to this chapter;
(f) [Immoral conduct, ]Unprofessional conduct[, or a violation of the code of
ethics];
(g) Teaching in an unlicensed school or in a school knowing that the school is not
in compliance with this chapter or the administrative regulations of the board
promulgated pursuant to this chapter;
(h) Failure to comply with the administrative regulations of the board.
(2) Payments in lieu of suspension collected by the board shall be deposited in the State
Treasury and credited to the general fund.
(3) The board may require retesting of any licensee upon proper showing of gross
malpractice or incompetence on the part of the licensee.
Section 11. KRS 317A.145 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall receive complaints concerning any person licensed or permitted
under this chapter relating to the licensee's business or professional practices. The
board may investigate all complaints concerning any person licensed under the
provisions of this chapter or any person that is performing services regulated by
this chapter without a license or permit. The board may on its own volition initiate
such an investigation and shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary for
the administration of the provisions of this section.
Page 24 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2232
(2) If upon investigation there appears to be a violation of the provisions of this
chapter, the board shall take such action as it deems necessary under the provisions
of KRS 317A.140.
(3) For the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this chapter, officers, agents, and
inspectors of the board may enter upon premises of all facilities issued a permit or
license by the board, at all reasonable times and during periods when those
premises are otherwise open to the public, and make inspections to determine
compliance with this chapter and the administrative regulations promulgated by the
board, and inspect books, papers, or records pertaining to the licensed activity, a
copy of which may be obtained by the board officer, agent, or inspector.
Section 12. KRS 317A.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any licensee or permitee[person] who violates any provision of this chapter shall
be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand five hundred
dollars ($1,500) per violation.
(2) Any person who provides services regulated by this chapter without a license
shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand five
hundred dollars ($1,500) per violation.
(3) Any person who violates any administrative regulation lawfully promulgated by the
board under the authority contained in this chapter shall be fined not less than
twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per
violation[.
(3) Any person who violates KRS 317A.020 or 317A.155 shall be guilty of a Class B
misdemeanor].
Page 25 of 25
BR223200.100 - 2232 - XXXX 3/27/2026 10:57 AM Jacketed